Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Chapter 16 Use Tax

Cross references. —

For the provisions of a Uniform Sales and Use Tax Administration Act, see ch. 15, art. 4 of this title.

Applicability of tax. —

Use tax applies both to merchandise already in state and to that which is brought into the state directly or on order. Continental Supply Co. v. People, 54 Wyo. 185, 88 P.2d 488,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1939).

Use tax was intended as a complement to the sales tax,

and the legislature did not intend to pile up sales taxes. County of Natrona v. Casper Air Serv., 536 P.2d 142,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1975).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Sales and Use Taxes §§ 167 to 236.

Validity and construction of provisions allowing use tax credit for tax paid in other state, 31 ALR4th 1206.

Sales and use taxes on sale or lease of mailing or customer list, 80 ALR4th 1126.

47B C.J.S. Internal Revenue §§ 586 to 607.